Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 44.48.150 and 2013 c 327 s 2 and 2013 c 63 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) ((By January 1, 2009, in))In collaboration with the office of financial management, using existing databases and structures currently shared, the office of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee shall establish and make available to the public a searchable state expenditure information website. The state expenditure information website shall provide access to current budget data, access to current accounting data for budgeted expenditures and staff, and access to historical data. At a minimum, the website will provide access or links to the following information as data are available:(a) State expenditures by fund or account;(b) State expenditures by agency, program within each agency, and subprogram within each program;(c) State revenues by major source;(d) State expenditures by object and subobject;(e) State agency workloads, caseloads, and performance measures, and recent performance audits;(f) State agency budget data, including carryforward level data, by activity; ((and))(g) Balances of each state fund or account; and(h) The inventory of state agency fees required by RCW 43.88.585.(2) "State agency," as used in this section, includes every state agency, office, board, commission, or institution of the executive, legislative, or judicial branches, including institutions of higher education.(3) The state expenditure information website shall be updated periodically as subsequent fiscal year data become available, and the prior year expenditure data shall be maintained by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee as part of its ten-year historical budget data.(4) By January 1, 2014, current and future capital project and transportation project investments must be coded with the geographic information sufficient to permit the public to search and identify appropriation and expenditure data at the parent and subproject level to the extent available by:(a) State legislative district;(b) County; and(c) Agency project identifier.(5) The office of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee must, within existing resources, update the state expenditure information website to allow the public to search for capital budget and transportation projects by selecting from an online geographical map. The map must allow an in-depth examination of financial and other data associated with such projects. Data elements must include:(a) Project title;(b) Total appropriation;(c) Project description;(d) Expenditure data; and(e) Administering agency.(6) The website must be easy to use, contain current and readily available data, and allow for review and analysis by the public. The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee must test the website with potential users to ensure that it is easy to navigate and comprehend.--- END ---